District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-304.02

Energy conservation.

Repealed.

Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 402, 32 DCR 7396
Apr. 5, 2005, D.C. Law 15-281, § 2(b), 52 DCR 847
Apr. 7, 2006, D.C. Law 16-91, § 130(c), 52 DCR 10637
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 1201(a), 58 DCR 1185

History

1981 Ed., § 1-1184.2.

Prior Codifications